Maryland, session 2026, SB0470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0470*

SENATE BILL 470
Article – Health Occupations
12–102.
(f) (1) This title does not prohibit a dentist, physician, nurse or midwife,
NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR, or podiatrist from personally dispensing a starter dosage of a
prescription drug or device to a patient of the dentist, physician, nurse or midwife,
NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR, or podiatrist, provided that:
(i) The starter dosage complies with the labeling requirements of §
12–505 of this title;
(ii) No charge is made for the starter dosage; and
(iii) The dentist, physician, nurse or midwife, NATUROPATHIC
DOCTOR, or podiatrist enters an appropriate record on the patient’s chart.
(2) For the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, “starter dosage”
means an amount of drug or device sufficient to begin therapy:
(i) Of short duration of 72 hours or less; or
(ii) Prior to obtaining a larger quantity of the drug or device to
complete the therapy.
14–5F–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Approved naturopathic medical program” means a naturopathic medical
education program:
(1) In the United States that:
(i) Provides the degree of Doctor of Naturopathy or Doctor of
Naturopathic Medicine;
(ii) Offers a 4–year graduate–level, full–time didactic and
supervised clinical training;
(iii) Is accredited, or has achieved candidacy status for accreditation,
by the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent federally and
Board–recognized accrediting body for naturopathic medical programs; and

SENATE BILL 470 3
(iv) Is part of an institution of higher education that is either
accredited, or is a candidate for accreditation, by a regional or national institutional
accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education; or
(2) In a diploma–granting, degree–equivalent college or university in
Canada that:
(i) Offers graduate–level, full–time didactic and supervised clinical
training;
(ii) Is accredited, or has achieved candidacy status for accreditation,
by the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent federally and
Board–recognized accrediting body for naturopathic medical programs; and
(iii) Has provincial approval for participation in government–funded
student aid programs.
(c) “Board” means the State Board of Physicians.
(d) “Committee” means the Naturopathic Medicine Advisory Committee.
(E) “CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 5–101 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
[(e)] (F) “Council” means the Naturopathic Doctors Formulary Council FOR
CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES.
[(f)] (G) (1) “Device” means a device used in the diagnosis, treatment, or
prevention of disease.
(2) “Device” does not include:
(i) Any surgical or dental instrument;
(ii) Any physical therapy equipment;
(iii) Any X–ray apparatus; or
(iv) Any component part or accessory of any of the items listed in
items (i) through (iii) of this paragraph.
[(g)] (H) “Emergency use epinephrine” means a portable, disposable drug
delivery device or product approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration that
contains a premeasured single dose of epinephrine that is used to treat anaphylaxis in an
emergency situation.

SENATE BILL 470
[(h)] (I) “Formulary” means a list of [drugs and devices] CONTROLLED
DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES developed and adopted in accordance with § 14–5F–04.1 of this
subtitle.
[(i)] (J) “Licensed naturopathic doctor” means a naturopathic doctor who is
licensed to practice naturopathic medicine.
[(j)] (K) “Naturopathic doctor” means an individual who practices naturopathic
medicine.
[(k)] (L) (1) “Naturopathic medicine” means the prevention, diagnosis, and
treatment of human health conditions, injury, and disease using only patient education and
naturopathic therapies and therapeutic substances recognized by the Council of
Naturopathic Medical Education.
(2) “Naturopathic medicine” includes:
(i) Counseling;
(ii) The practice of the mechanical sciences of healing, including
mechanotherapy, articular manipulation, corrective and orthopedic gymnastics,
hydrotherapy, electrotherapy, and phototherapy;
(iii) The practice of the material sciences of healing, including
nutrition, phytotherapy, treatment by natural substances, and external applications; [and]
(iv) Prescribing, [dispensing] PROVIDING, or administering
nonprescription [and prescription] drugs and devices [listed in the formulary];
(V) PRESCRIBING OR ADMINISTERING:
1. PRESCRIPTION DRUGS AND DEVICES THAT ARE NOT
CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES; AND
2. CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES LISTED IN
THE FORMULARY; AND
(VI) DISPENSING A STARTER DOSAGE OF A DRUG OR DEVICE
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (V) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
[(l)] (M) “Naturopathic musculoskeletal mobilization” means the treatment by
manual and other mechanical means of all body tissues exclusive of high–velocity thrusts
at or beyond the end range of normal joint motion.
[(m)] (N) “Nonprescription drug” means a drug that:

SENATE BILL 470 5
(1) May be sold without a prescription; and
(2) Is labeled for use by a consumer in accordance with State and federal
law.
[(n)] (O) “Prescription drug” means any drug defined in § 503(b) of the federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act if the drug’s label is required to bear the statement “Rx only”.
14–5F–04.1.
(a) (1) There is a Naturopathic Doctors Formulary Council FOR
CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES within the Board.
(2) The Council consists of the following members:
(i) The Deputy Secretary of Public Health Services, or the Deputy
Secretary’s designee; and
(ii) The following members, appointed by the Board:
1. Two individuals who:
A. Practice naturopathic medicine in the State;
B. Are certified by the North American Board of
Naturopathic Examiners;
C. Have a minimum of 2 [years] YEARS’ experience; and
D. Are licensed naturopathic doctors;
2. Two licensed physicians who practice in the State;
3. One pharmacist who has a background in pharmacognosy
and who practices in the State; and
4. One consumer.
(3) (i) The term of an appointed member is 4 years.
(ii) At the end of a term, an appointed member continues to serve
until a successor is appointed.
(4) A member of the Council:
(i) May not receive compensation as a member of the Council; but

SENATE BILL 470
(ii) Is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard
State Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(5) The Board shall designate the chair of the Council.
(6) The Board shall provide staff for the Council.
(b) The Council shall:
(1) Develop and recommend to the Board a formulary FOR CONTROLLED
DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES for use by licensed naturopathic doctors;
(2) Annually review the formulary adopted by the Board under subsection
(c) of this section to determine if any changes are necessary for compliance with current
prescribing standards or the practice of naturopathic medicine;
(3) Otherwise review the formulary at the direction of the Board; and
(4) Make recommendations to the Board based on the reviews conducted
under items (2) and (3) of this subsection.
(c) (1) The Board shall adopt a formulary based on the recommendations of
the Council made under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The Board may modify or reject any recommendation of the Council
regarding the formulary.
(d) [(1)] The formulary adopted by the Board [shall include:
(i) Nonprescription drugs and devices;
(ii) Prescription oxygen and emergency use epinephrine; and
(iii) Prescription diaphragms and cervical caps for contraception.
(2) The formulary may not include:
(i) Except as provided in paragraph (1)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection,
prescription drugs or devices; or
(ii) Controlled substances] MAY INCLUDE ONLY CONTROLLED
DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES LISTED IN SCHEDULE III, SCHEDULE IV, OR SCHEDULE
V UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
14–5F–14.

SENATE BILL 470 7
(a) A license authorizes a licensee, consistent with naturopathic education and
training and competence demonstrated by passing the naturopathic physician licensing
examination, to:
(1) Order and perform physical and laboratory examinations for diagnostic
purposes, including phlebotomy, clinical laboratory tests, orificial examinations,
electrocardiograms with over read by a cardiologist, and physiological function tests;
(2) Order diagnostic imaging studies and interpret the reports of diagnostic
imaging studies;
(3) Dispense or order natural medicines of mineral, animal, or botanical
origin, including food, extracts of food, nutraceuticals, vitamins, amino acids, minerals,
enzymes, botanicals and their extracts, botanical medicines, homeopathic medicines, and
all dietary supplements and nonprescription drugs [listed in the formulary] that use
various routes of administration, including oral, nasal, auricular, ocular, rectal, vaginal,
transdermal, [and] intramuscular, SUBCUTANEOUS, AND INTRAVENOUS;
(4) Administer natural medicines of mineral, animal, or botanical origin,
including food, extracts of food, nutraceuticals, vitamins, amino acids, minerals, enzymes,
botanicals and their extracts, botanical medicines, homeopathic medicines, and all dietary
supplements and nonprescription drugs [listed in the formulary] using various routes of
administration, including oral, nasal, auricular, ocular, rectal, vaginal, [and] transdermal,
INTRAMUSCULAR, SUBCUTANEOUS, AND INTRAVENOUS;
(5) Administer emergency use epinephrine;
(6) Administer or perform hot or cold hydrotherapy, naturopathic physical
medicine, electromagnetic energy, and therapeutic exercise for the purpose of providing
basic therapeutic care services, except that if a referral to another licensed provider is
appropriate for ongoing rehabilitation or habilitation services, the naturopathic doctor shall
make the referral;
(7) Provide health education and health counseling; [and]
(8) Perform naturopathic musculoskeletal mobilization;
(9) PRESCRIBE, PROVIDE, AND ADMINISTER NONPRESCRIPTION
DRUGS AND DEVICES;
(10) SUBJECT TO ITEM (11) OF THIS SUBSECTION, PRESCRIBE,
DISPENSE A STARTER DOSAGE OF, AND ADMINISTER WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR DEVICE; AND

SENATE BILL 470
(11) PRESCRIBE, DISPENSE A STARTER DOSAGE OF, AND ADMINISTER
WITHIN THE SCOPE OF NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE A CONTROLLED DANGEROUS
SUBSTANCE LISTED IN THE FORMULARY IF THE LICENSEE HAS A VALID:
(I) STATE CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE
REGISTRATION; AND
(II) FEDERAL DRUG ENFORCEMENT AGENCY REGISTRATION.
(b) A license does not authorize a licensee to:
(1) Except for a [prescription drug or device included in the formulary
under § 14–5F–04.1(d)(1)(ii) or (iii) of this subtitle, prescribe,] STARTER DOSAGE
DISPENSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–102 OF THIS ARTICLE, dispense[, or
administer] any prescription drug or device;
(2) PRESCRIBE OR ADMINISTER ANY CONTROLLED DANGEROUS
SUBSTANCE NOT LISTED IN THE FORMULARY;
[(2)] (3) Perform surgical procedures;
[(3)] (4) Practice or claim to practice as a medical doctor or physician, an
osteopath, a dentist, a podiatrist, an optometrist, a psychologist, a nurse practitioner, a
physician assistant, a chiropractor, a physical therapist, an acupuncturist, or any other
health care professional unless licensed under this article;
[(4)] (5) Use general or spinal anesthetics;
[(5)] (6) Administer ionizing radioactive substances for therapeutic
purposes;
[(6)] (7) Perform chiropractic adjustments or manipulations that include
high–velocity thrusts at or beyond the end range of normal joint motion unless the licensee
is also a licensed chiropractor;
[(7)] (8) Perform acupuncture unless the licensee is also a licensed
acupuncturist; or
[(8)] (9) Prescribe, dispense, or administer any prescription [or
nonprescription] drug or device [listed in the formulary] for cosmetic purposes.
14–5F–15.
(c) The Board shall renew the license of a licensee who:

SENATE BILL 470 9
(1) Submits a renewal application on the form that the Board requires;
(2) Is of good moral character;
(3) Pays a renewal fee set by the Board;
(4) Is otherwise entitled to be licensed; AND
(5) Meets the continuing education requirements adopted by the Board[;
and
(6) Provides evidence of biennial cardiopulmonary resuscitation
certification].
14–5F–18.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license of any licensee if the applicant or licensee:
(26) Violates any provision of this title or any regulation adopted by the
Board; [or]
(27) Fails to complete a criminal history records check under § 14–308.1 of
this title;
(28) EXCEPT AS TO AN ASSOCIATION THAT HAS REMAINED
IN CONTINUOUS EXISTENCE SINCE JULY 1, 1963:
(I) ASSOCIATES WITH A PHARMACIST AS A PARTNER OR
CO–OWNER OF A PHARMACY FOR THE PURPOSE OF OPERATING A PHARMACY;
(II) EMPLOYS A PHARMACIST FOR THE PURPOSE OF OPERATING
A PHARMACY; OR
(III) CONTRACTS WITH A PHARMACIST FOR THE PURPOSE OF
OPERATING A PHARMACY;
(29) FAILS TO COMPLY WITH § 1–223 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(30) FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE
PRESCRIPTION DRUG MONITORING PROGRAM UNDER TITLE 21, SUBTITLE 2A OF
THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE; OR

SENATE BILL 470
(31) FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 12–102 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
14–5F–20.
(G) THE BOARD SHALL INCLUDE ON THE LICENSEE’S PROFILE, AS
REPORTED TO THE BOARD BY THE LICENSEE:
(1) WHETHER THE LICENSEE MAINTAINS PROFESSIONAL LIABILITY
INSURANCE; AND
(2) THE NUMBER OF MEDICAL MALPRACTICE FINAL COURT
JUDGMENTS AND ARBITRATION AWARDS AGAINST THE LICENSEE WITHIN THE MOST
RECENT 10–YEAR PERIOD.
14–5F–20.1.
ON REQUEST OF THE BOARD, A NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR WHO REPORTS TO
THE BOARD THAT THE NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR MAINTAINS PROFESSIONAL
LIABILITY INSURANCE FOR PURPOSES OF THE PUBLIC INDIVIDUAL PROFILE
MAINTAINED BY THE BOARD UNDER § 14–5F–20 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL PROVIDE
THE BOARD WITH VERIFICATION OR OTHER DOCUMENTATION THAT THE
NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR MAINTAINS THE INSURANCE WITHIN 25 BUSINESS DAYS
AFTER THE NATUROPATHIC DOCTOR RECEIVES A REQUEST FROM THE BOARD.
14–5F–20.2.
(A) EACH LICENSEE PRACTICING NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE IN THE STATE
SHALL NOTIFY A PATIENT IN WRITING IF:
(1) THE LICENSEE DOES NOT MAINTAIN PROFESSIONAL LIABILITY
INSURANCE COVERAGE; OR
(2) THE LICENSEE’S PROFESSIONAL LIABILITY INSURANCE
COVERAGE HAS LAPSED FOR ANY PERIOD OF TIME AND THE LICENSEE’S COVERAGE
HAS NOT BEEN RENEWED.
(B) THE WRITTEN NOTIFICATION PROVIDED TO THE PATIENT UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(1) PROVIDED:
(I) AT THE FIRST VISIT BY THE PATIENT DURING ANY PERIOD
IN WHICH THE LICENSEE DOES NOT MAINTAIN PROFESSIONAL LIABILITY

SENATE BILL 470 11
INSURANCE, UNLESS THE VISIT IS FOR THE PURPOSE OF RECEIVING INCIDENTAL
MEDICAL CARE THAT WILL BE RENDERED FREE OF CHARGE; AND
(II) AS PART OF EACH INFORMED CONSENT OBTAINED BEFORE
ANY PROCEDURE DISCUSSED OR OFFERED FOR THE PATIENT’S CONSIDERATION IS
PERFORMED;
(2) SIGNED BY THE PATIENT AT THE TIME OF THE PATIENT’S VISIT OR
THE INFORMED CONSENT IS SIGNED; AND
(3) RETAINED BY THE LICENSEE AS PART OF THE LICENSEE’S
PATIENT RECORDS.
(C) EACH LICENSEE PRACTICING NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE IN THE STATE
WHO DOES NOT MAINTAIN PROFESSIONAL LIABILITY INSURANCE COVERAGE SHALL
POST THIS INFORMATION IN A CONSPICUOUS LOCATION IN THE LICENSEE’S PLACE
OF PRACTICE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.